Massachusetts, session 194th, H155.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. There shall be established a special legislative commission to study the
practice of lab shopping in the cannabis industry. The commission’s study shall include, but not
be limited to, the frequency, risks, and processes used by cultivators practicing lab shopping.
SECTION 2. The commission shall include: the chairs of the joint committee on cannabis
policy, who shall serve as co-chairs of the commission; 1 member appointed by the speaker of
the house of representatives; 1 member appointed by the president of the senate;1 member
appointed by the minority leader of the house of representatives; 1 member appointed by the
minority leader of the senate; the executive director of the cannabis control commission or their
designee; the attorney general or their designee; and the treasurer or their designee.
of 2

SECTION 3. The commission shall submit its report, along with any recommendations,
to the clerk’s office of the house of representatives and the senate no later than 1 year after the
passage of this act.

of 2